Missouri, session 2026, HB1706.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 28, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 28.850, to read as follows:
28.850. 1. A glossary of terms used in the Constitution of Missouri shall be
created and managed under the provisions of this section.
2. Beginning on September 1, 2027, and every September first in odd-numbered
years thereafter, the secretary of state shall accept proposals of terms for inclusion in the
constitutional glossary from members of the public and the general assembly.
Submissions shall close on December thirty-first of each odd-numbered year.
3. Proposals shall include the following:
(1) The precise term to be defined;
(2) Citations to the use of such term throughout the constitution; and
(3) A proposed concise, neutral definition of such term.
4. The secretary of state shall review all proposals and select terms for inclusion
in the constitutional glossary. The secretary of state shall, in consultation with the
attorney general, ensure that all proposed definitions are concise, neutral, and accurate.
The secretary of state may, in consultation with the attorney general, rewrite proposed
definitions to ensure the definitions meet the requirements of this section.
5. The secretary of state shall complete a list of terms along with citations to the
use of such terms in the Constitution of Missouri and the proposed definition in time for
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1706 2
such terms to be included as a ballot measure on the general election ballot, beginning
with the general election in 2028.
6. Terms receiving a simple majority of votes in favor of the proposed definition
shall be deemed added to the constitutional glossary.
7. Defined terms may be altered or removed by the same process as new terms
are proposed under this section.
8. The secretary of state shall be responsible for maintaining and publishing the
constitutional glossary in print and on the secretary of state's website.
✔